Michigan, session 2025-2026, SB0078.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 1b. (1) For purposes the purpose of a petition to set aside a conviction under section 1 or 1e, more than 1 felony offense or more than 1 misdemeanor offense must be treated as a single felony or misdemeanor conviction if the felony or misdemeanor convictions were contemporaneous such that all of the felony or misdemeanor offenses occurred within 24 hours and arose from the same transaction, provided that none of those felony or misdemeanor offenses constitute any of the following: (a) An assaultive crime. (b) A crime involving the use or possession of a dangerous weapon. (c) A crime with a maximum penalty of 10 or more years' imprisonment. (d) A conviction for a crime that if it had been obtained in this state would be for an assaultive crime. (2) For the purpose of a petition to set aside a conviction under section 1j, a felony offense and 1 or more misdemeanor offenses must be treated as a single felony conviction if the felony and misdemeanor convictions were contemporaneous such that all of the offenses occurred within 24 hours and arose from the same transaction. (3) (2) As used in this section, "dangerous weapon" means that term as defined in section 110a of the Michigan penal code, 1931 PA 328, MCL 750.110a. Sec. 1c. (1) A Except as otherwise provided in section 1j, a person shall not apply to have set aside, and a judge shall not set aside, a conviction for any of the following: (a) A felony for which the maximum punishment is life imprisonment or an attempt to commit a felony for which the maximum punishment is life imprisonment. (b) A violation or attempted violation of section 136b(3), 136d(1)(b) or (c), 145c, 145d, 520c, 520d, or 520g of the Michigan penal code, 1931 PA 328, MCL 750.136b, 750.136d, 750.145c, 750.145d, 750.520c, 750.520d, and 750.520g. (c) A violation or attempted violation of section 520e of the Michigan penal code, 1931 PA 328, MCL 750.520e, if the conviction occurred on or after January 12, 2015. (d) The following traffic offenses: (i) Subject to subsections (3) and (4), a conviction for operating while intoxicated committed by any person. (ii) Any traffic offense committed by an individual with an indorsement on his or her operator's or chauffeur's license to operate a commercial motor vehicle that was committed while the individual was operating the commercial motor vehicle or was in another manner a commercial motor vehicle violation. (iii) Any traffic offense that causes injury or death. (e) A felony conviction for domestic violence, if the person has a previous misdemeanor conviction for domestic violence. (f) A violation of former section 462i or 462j or chapter LXVIIA or chapter LXXXIII-A of the Michigan penal code, 1931 PA 328, MCL 750.462a to 750.462h and 750.543a to 750.543z. (2) The prohibition on the setting aside of the convictions under subsection (1) upon application also applies to the setting aside of convictions without application under section 1g. (3) The prohibition on setting aside a conviction for operating while intoxicated under subsection (1)(d)(i) does not apply to a conviction for a first violation operating while intoxicated offense if the person applying to have the first violation operating while intoxicated offense conviction set aside has not previously applied to have and had a first violation operating while intoxicated offense conviction set aside under this act. However, a conviction for a first violation operating while intoxicated offense that may be set aside upon application is not eligible for and shall not be set aside without application under section 1g. (4) In making a determination whether to grant the petition to set aside a first violation operating while intoxicated offense conviction, the reviewing court may consider whether or not the petitioner has benefited from rehabilitative or educational programs, if any were ordered by the sentencing court, or whether such steps were taken by the petitioner before sentencing for the first violation operating while intoxicated offense conviction he or she is seeking to set aside. The reviewing court is not constrained by the record made at sentencing. The reviewing court may deny the petition if it is not convinced that the petitioner has either availed himself or herself of rehabilitative or educational programming or benefited from rehabilitative or educational programming he or she has completed. (5) An order setting aside a conviction for a traffic offense under this act must not require that the conviction be removed or expunged from the applicant's driving record maintained by the secretary of state as required under the Michigan vehicle code, 1949 PA 300, MCL 257.1 to 257.923. Sec. 1d. (1) An application under section 1 to set aside more than 1 felony conviction shall only be filed 7 or more years after whichever of the following events occurs last: (a) Imposition of the sentence for the convictions that the applicant seeks to set aside. (b) Completion of any term of felony probation imposed for the convictions that the applicant seeks to set aside. (c) Discharge from parole imposed for the convictions that the applicant seeks to set aside. (d) Completion of any term of imprisonment imposed for the convictions that the applicant seeks to set aside. (2) An application under section 1 to set aside 1 or more serious misdemeanor convictions, 1 first violation operating while intoxicated offense, or 1 felony conviction shall only be filed 5 or more years after whichever of the following events occurs last: (a) Imposition of the sentence for the conviction or convictions that the applicant seeks to set aside. (b) Completion of probation imposed for the conviction or convictions that the applicant seeks to set aside. (c) Discharge from parole imposed for the conviction that the applicant seeks to set aside, if applicable. (d) Completion of any term of imprisonment imposed for the conviction or convictions that the applicant seeks to set aside. (3) An application under section 1 to set aside 1 or more misdemeanor convictions, other than an application to set aside a serious misdemeanor, a first violation operating while intoxicated offense, or any other misdemeanor conviction for an assaultive crime, shall only be filed 3 or more years after whichever of the following events occurs last: (a) Imposition of the sentence for the conviction that the applicant seeks to set aside. (b) Completion of any term of imprisonment imposed for the conviction that the applicant seeks to set aside. (c) Completion of probation imposed for the conviction or convictions that the applicant seeks to set aside. (4) For an application under section 1, a court shall not enter an order setting aside a conviction or convictions unless all of the following apply: (a) The applicable time period required under subsection (1), (2), or (3) has elapsed. (b) There are no criminal charges pending against the applicant. (c) The applicant has not been convicted of any criminal offense during the applicable time period required under subsection (1), (2), or (3). (5) If Except as provided in section 1j, if a petition under this act is denied by the convicting court, a person shall not file another petition concerning the same conviction or convictions with the convicting court until 3 years after the date the convicting court denies the previous petition, unless the court specifies an earlier date for filing another petition in the order denying the petition. (6) An application under section 1(3) may be filed at any time following the date of the conviction to be set aside. A person may apply to have more than 1 conviction set aside under section 1(3). (7) An application under section 1 is invalid unless it contains the following information and is signed under oath by the person whose conviction is or convictions are to be set aside: (a) The full name and current address of the applicant. (b) A certified record of each conviction that is to be set aside. (c) For an application under section 1(1), a statement that the applicant has not been convicted of an offense during the applicable time period required under subsection (1), (2), or (3). (d) A statement listing all actions enumerated in section 1(2) that were initiated against the applicant and have been dismissed. (e) A statement as to whether the applicant has previously filed an application to set aside this or other conviction and, if so, the disposition of the application. (f) A statement as to whether the applicant has any other criminal charge pending against him or her in any court in the United States or in any other country. (g) If the person is seeking to have 1 or more convictions set aside under section 1(3), a statement that he or she meets the criteria set forth in section 1(3), together with a statement of the facts supporting his or her contention that the conviction was a direct result of his or her being a victim of human trafficking. (h) A consent to the use of the nonpublic record created under section 3 to the extent authorized by section 3. (8) The An applicant under this act shall submit a copy of the application and 1 complete set of fingerprints to the department of state police. The department of state police shall compare those fingerprints with the records of the department, including the nonpublic record created under section 3, and shall forward an electronic copy of a complete set of fingerprints to the Federal Bureau of Investigation for a comparison with the records available to that agency. The department of state police shall report to the court in which the application is filed the information contained in the department's records with respect to any pending charges against the applicant, any record of conviction of the applicant, and the setting aside of any conviction of the applicant and shall report to the court any similar information obtained from the Federal Bureau of Investigation. The court shall not act upon the application until the department of state police reports the information required by this subsection to the court. (9) The copy of the application submitted to the department of state police under subsection (8) must be accompanied by a fee of $50.00 payable to the state of Michigan that must be used by the department of state police to defray the expenses incurred in processing the application. (10) A For an application under this act, a copy of the application must be served upon the attorney general and upon the office of each prosecuting attorney who prosecuted the crime or crimes the applicant seeks to set aside, and an opportunity must be given to the attorney general and to the prosecuting attorney to contest the application. If For an application under this act, if a conviction was for an assaultive crime or a serious misdemeanor, the prosecuting attorney shall notify the victim of the assaultive crime or serious misdemeanor of the application under section 22a or 77a of the William Van Regenmorter crime victim's rights act, 1985 PA 87, MCL 780.772a and 780.827a. The notice must be by first-class mail to the victim's last known address. The victim has the right to appear at any proceeding under this act concerning that conviction and to make a written or oral statement. (11) For an application under section 1(1), upon the hearing of the application the court may require the filing of affidavits and the taking of proofs as it considers proper. (12) For an application under section 1(3), if the applicant proves to the court by a preponderance of the evidence that the conviction was a direct result of his or her being a victim of human trafficking, the court may, subject to the requirements of subsection (13), enter an order setting aside the conviction. (13) If the court determines that the circumstances and behavior of an applicant under section 1(1) or (3), from the date of the applicant's conviction or convictions to the filing of the application warrant setting aside the conviction or convictions, and that setting aside the conviction or convictions is consistent with the public welfare, the court may enter an order setting aside the conviction or convictions. (14) The setting aside of a conviction or convictions under this act is a privilege and conditional and is not a right. Sec. 1j. (1) For an offense otherwise ineligible for a set aside under section 1c, an individual may file an application with the convicting court to set aside a felony conviction, if all of the following conditions apply: (a) The applicant committed the felony before the applicant's eighteenth birthday. (b) The applicant has been successfully discharged from the department of corrections. (c) Fifteen years have passed since the applicant's release from incarceration. (d) The applicant has not been convicted of a criminal charge on or after the applicant's eighteenth birthday or had any other conviction set aside under this act. (e) The applicant does not have a pending criminal charge. (f) The applicant has not tested positive for the illegal use of a controlled substance since the felony conviction to be set aside. (g) The applicant can demonstrate a record and reputation that shows the applicant is not likely to act in a manner that is a danger to the safety of others. (h) The felony conviction to be set aside is not a listed offense as defined in section 2 of the sex offenders registration act, 1994 PA 295, MCL 28.722. (2) An individual applying for the setting aside of a conviction or convictions under subsection (1) shall file an application to the convicting court that includes all of the following, if applicable: (a) The applicant's signature, under oath, affirmatively stating that the applicant qualifies under subsection (1). (b) A certified record of each conviction that is requested to be set aside. (c) A complete set of fingerprints and copy of the application sent to the department of state police, in accordance with section 1d(8). (d) A resume or curriculum vitae. (e) Reference letters. (f) Academic credentials. (g) An internet criminal history access tool report. (h) A driving record from this state or another state. (i) A personal letter of interest. (j) Community involvement. (k) Elected offices or appointments. (l) Assumed name and business information. (m) Ties to the community. (n) Awards and recognitions. (o) Media coverage. (p) A $150.00 fee to be paid to the Michigan set aside fund created under section 1i. (3) The court shall review the application and determine if the application should be granted. If the application is granted, the court shall enter an order setting aside the conviction or convictions. If the application is denied by the convicting court, the applicant may reapply under subsection (1) 1 year after the date the convicting court denies the previous application, unless the court specifies an earlier date. (4) As used in this section, except for marihuana used in compliance with the laws of this state, "controlled substance" means that term as defined in section 7104 of the public health code, 1978 PA 368, MCL 333.7104. Sec. 2. (1) Upon the entry of an order by the court under section 1, or 1e, or 1j, or upon the automatic setting aside of a conviction under section 1g, the applicant, for purposes of the law, is considered not to have been previously convicted, except as provided in this section and section 3. (2) The applicant is not entitled to the remission of any fine, costs, or other money paid as a consequence of a conviction that is set aside. (3) If the conviction set aside under section 1(1), 1e, or 1g is for a listed offense as defined in section 2 of the sex offenders registration act, 1994 PA 295, MCL 28.722, the applicant is considered to have been convicted of that offense for purposes of that act. (4) This act does not affect the right of the applicant to rely upon the conviction to bar subsequent proceedings for the same offense. (5) This act does not affect the right of a victim of a crime to prosecute or defend a civil action for damages. (6) This act does not create a right to commence an action for damages for incarceration under the sentence that the applicant served before the conviction is set aside under this act. (7) This act does not relieve any obligation to pay restitution owed to the victim of a crime nor does it affect the jurisdiction of the convicting court or the authority of any court order with regard to enforcing an order for restitution. (8) A conviction, including any records relating to the conviction and any records concerning a collateral action, that has been set aside under this act cannot be used as evidence in an action for negligent hiring, admission, or licensure against any person. (9) A conviction that is set aside under section 1, 1e, or 1g, or 1j may be considered a prior conviction by court, law enforcement agency, prosecuting attorney, or the attorney general, as applicable, for purposes of charging a crime as a second or subsequent offense or for sentencing under sections 10, 11, and 12 of chapter IX of the code of criminal procedure, 1927 PA 175, MCL 769.10, 769.11, and 769.12. (10) As used in this section, "applicant" includes an individual who has applied under this act to have his or her conviction or convictions set aside and an individual whose conviction or convictions have been set aside without an application under section 1g. Sec. 3. (1) Upon the entry of an order under section 1, or 1e, or 1j, the court shall send a copy of the order to the arresting agency and the department of state police. (2) The department of state police shall retain a nonpublic record of the order setting aside a conviction, or other notification regarding a conviction that was automatically set aside under section 1g, and of the record of the arrest, fingerprints, conviction, and sentence of the person in the case to which the order or other notification applies. Except as provided in subsection (3), this nonpublic record shall be made available only to a court of competent jurisdiction, an agency of the judicial branch of state government, the department of corrections, a law enforcement agency, a prosecuting attorney, the attorney general, or the governor upon request and only for the following purposes: (a) Consideration in a licensing function conducted by an agency of the judicial branch of state government. (b) To show that a person who has filed an application to set aside a conviction has previously had a conviction set aside under this act. (c) The court's consideration in determining the sentence to be imposed upon conviction for a subsequent offense that is punishable as a felony or by imprisonment for more than 1 year. (d) Consideration by the governor if a person whose conviction has been set aside applies for a pardon for another offense. (e) Consideration by the department of corrections or a law enforcement agency if a person whose conviction has been set aside applies for employment with the department of corrections or law enforcement agency. (f) Consideration by a court, law enforcement agency, prosecuting attorney, or the attorney general in determining whether an individual required to be registered under the sex offenders registration act, 1994 PA 295, MCL 28.721 to 28.736, 28.730, has violated that act, or for use in a prosecution for violating that act. (g) Consideration by a court, law enforcement agency, prosecuting attorney, or the attorney general for use in making determinations regarding charging, plea offers, and sentencing, as applicable. (3) A copy of the nonpublic record created under subsection (2) must be provided to the person whose conviction is set aside under this act upon payment of a fee determined and charged by the department of state police in the same manner as the fee prescribed in section 4 of the freedom of information act, 1976 PA 442, MCL 15.234. (4) The nonpublic record maintained under subsection (2) is exempt from disclosure under the freedom of information act, 1976 PA 442, MCL 15.231 to 15.246. (5) Except as provided in subsection (2), a person, other than the person whose conviction was set aside or a victim, who knows or should have known that a conviction was set aside under this section and who divulges, uses, or publishes information concerning a conviction set aside under this section is guilty of a misdemeanor punishable by imprisonment for not more than 90 days or a fine of not more than $500.00, or both. (6) An entity is not liable for damages or subject to criminal penalties under this section for reporting a public record of conviction that has been set-aside set aside by court order or operation of law, if that record was available as a public record on the date of the report. (7) (6) As used in this section, "victim" means any individual who suffers direct or threatened physical, financial, or emotional harm as the result of the offense that was committed by the applicant. Enacting section 1. Section 4 of 1965 PA 213, MCL 780.624, is repealed.